DictionaryAnalyser/toy_example/apertium-es-ca/.deps/pgen-ca_valencia.dix
    <pardef n="el">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>l'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>de</l>
          <r>el<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="de"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>el<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant_menys_d"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>l'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>el</r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>el<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>l'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocals_per_a_la"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>de</l>
          <r>la<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="de"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>la<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonants_per_a_la_menys_d"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>u</l>
          <r>l'u</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>i</l>
          <r>l'i</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>l'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocals_per_a_la"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>la<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonants_per_a_la"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>la</r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonants_per_a_la"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="els">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>els<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>els<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>els</r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofa"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="les">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>les<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>les</r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>de</l>
          <r>les<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="de"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>les<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofa_menys_d"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="combina_el-els-et-en">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l<b/></l>
          <r>'l<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l<b/></l>
          <r><b/>l'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l<b/><a/></l>
          <r>'l<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l<b/><a/></l>
          <r><b/>l'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ls<b/></l>
          <r>'ls<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t<b/></l>
          <r>'t<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n<b/></l>
          <r>'n<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n<b/></l>
          <r><b/>n'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n<b/><a/></l>
          <r>'n<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n<b/><a/></l>
          <r><b/>n'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mi">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>'m<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><b/>m'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/></l>
          <r>'m<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/></l>
          <r><b/>m'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ti">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>'t<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><b/>t'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/></l>
          <r>'t<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/></l>
          <r><b/>t'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="em">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>m'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>em</r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>em<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>m'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general_menys_e"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>me<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="marcats_no_apostrofen"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>e</l>
          <r>me</r>
        </p>
        <par n="combina_el-els-et-en"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="et">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>t'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>et</r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>et<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>t'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general_menys_e"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>te<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="marcats_no_apostrofen"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>e</l>
          <r>te</r>
        </p>
        <par n="combina_el-els-et-en"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>em<b/></l>
          <r>te</r>
        </p>
        <par n="mi"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>ens<b/></l>
          <r>te'ns<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>el</l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="el"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>la</l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="la"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>els</l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="els"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>les</l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="les"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>em</l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="em"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>et</l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="et"/>
      </e>
